Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Local Level

Cross references. —

As to municipal planning and zoning, see §§

15-1-501

through

15-1-611

.

As to county planning and zoning, see chapter 5 of title 18.

§ 9-8-301.
Development of plans.

All local governments shall develop a local land use plan within their jurisdiction.

All incorporated cities and towns shall have the option to develop a land use plan in accordance with the requirements of W.S. 9-8-302(a), or cooperate with the county to develop such a plan under W.S. 9-8-302(b).

All counties shall develop a countywide land use plan which shall incorporate the land use plans of all incorporated cities and towns within the county.

As used in this article:

“Local land use plan” means any written statement of land use policies, visions, goals and objectives adopted by local governments. Local land use plans shall provide an explanation of the methods for implementation of the plan, however, these plans shall not require any provisions for zoning and implementation of the plan shall be subject to the provisions of this article. Any local land use plan may contain maps, graphs, charts, illustrations or any other form of written or visual communication;

“Zoning” means a form of regulatory control granted to local governments which may be used to guide and to develop specific allowable land use.

Local land use plans may guide local governments in adopting or amending local zoning regulations, however, such plans shall not be construed as a substitute for, or equivalent to, duly enacted local zoning regulations, which have the force and effect of law. Local land use plans shall be implemented in accordance with the following:

In the event of a conflict between a duly enacted local zoning regulation and a local land use plan the local zoning regulation shall control;

No local government shall require that a land use or physical development be consistent with a local land use plan unless the applicable provisions of the local land use plan have been incorporated into the local zoning regulations.

Nothing in this article shall allow any local government to use a local land use plan as authority to deny or restrict a permissible land use or physical development which is not restricted or prohibited under existing zoning regulations.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-856; W.S. 1977, § 9-19-301; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2013 ch. 192, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2021 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to incorporated towns generally, see chapter 2 of title 15.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted the last sentence in (a), which read: “The plans shall be consistent with established state guidelines and be subject to review and approval by the commission” and added (d).

Laws 2013, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (d)(i), added "visions," in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted "Local land use" for "Such," "provide" for "relate to," added "of the plan" and "implementation of the plan shall be subject to the provisions of this article"; and added (e) and (f).

Quoted

in

Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Mining Law — Gravel Extraction — Is Control Over Small Gravel Mining The Best Road For Regulation?
State v. Rowe, 133 Ore. App. 41, 889 P.2d 1329, 1995 Ore. App. LEXIS 303 (Wyo. 1995),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1997).

§ 9-8-302.
Procedural requirements; intergovernmental cooperation.

The duty, procedures and requirements for public hearings and responsibility for land use planning at the local level shall be exercised by the cities and towns pursuant to W.S.

15-1-601

et seq. and by the respective counties pursuant to W.S.

18-5-201

et seq.

For the purpose of development of local land use plans, the local government within each city, town and county may cooperate in the development of land use plans in accordance with the powers granted by the Wyoming Joint Powers Act.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-857; W.S. 1977, § 9-19-302; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2013 ch. 192, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted “not inconsistent with established goals, policies and guidelines” in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

Cited

in

Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996); Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Land and the Law One Hundred Years After Statehood — A Perspective,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1991).